Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Policy and Contract Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Property settlement agreement as affecting divorced spouse's right to recover as named beneficiary under former spouse's life insurance policy, 31 ALR4th 59.

§ 26-16-101.
Scope and applicability of chapter.

This chapter, except W.S.

26-16-118

,

26-16-120

and

26-16-505

, applies only to contracts of life insurance and annuities, other than reinsurance, group life insurance and group annuities.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136,§ 338; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-338; Laws 1983, ch. 190,§ 1; 2019 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added "and

26-16-505

" and made related changes.

§ 26-16-102.
Standard provisions required.

No life insurance policy, other than group and pure endowments with or without return of premiums or of premiums and interest, shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains provisions conforming in substance to each of the applicable provisions specified in W.S.

26-16-103

through

26-16-114

. This section does not apply to annuity contracts nor to any provisions of a life insurance policy, or contract supplemental thereto, relating to disability benefits or to additional benefits in case of death by accident or accidental means.

Any of the provisions or portions thereof not applicable to single premium or term policies, to that extent, shall not be incorporated in the policy.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-340; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 340; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-103.
Grace period.

A grace period of thirty (30) days, or, at the insurer’s option, of one (1) month of not less than thirty (30) days, or of four (4) weeks in the case of industrial life insurance policies the premiums for which are payable more frequently than monthly, shall be allowed within which the payment of any premium after the first may be made. The policy shall continue in full force during the grace period, which shall be counted from the premium due date specified in the policy. The insurer may impose an interest charge not to exceed six percent (6%) per annum for the number of days of grace elapsing before the payment of the premium, and, whether or not the interest charge is imposed, if a claim arises under the policy during the grace period the amount of any premium due or overdue, together with interest and any deferred installment of the annual premium, may be deducted from the policy proceeds.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-341; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136 § 341; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Applied

in

Bruegger v. National Old Line Ins. Co., 387 F. Supp. 1177, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14077 (D. Wyo. 1975).

§ 26-16-104.
Incontestability.

The policy, exclusive of provisions relating to disability benefits or to additional benefits in case of death by accident or accidental means, is incontestable, except for nonpayment of premiums, after it is in force during the insured’s lifetime for a period of two (2) years from its date of issue.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-342; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 342; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Stay of action at law brought before incontestable period expired

under former statute. Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Banion, 86 F.2d 886, 1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3882 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1936).

§ 26-16-105.
Policy and application constitutes entire contract; statements deemed representations.

The policy, or the policy and the application therefor if a copy of the application is endorsed upon or attached to the policy when issued, constitutes the entire contract between the parties and statements contained in the application, in the absence of fraud, are representations and not warranties.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-343; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 343; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-106

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-106.
Misstatement of age.

If the age of the insured or of any other person whose age is considered in determining the premium or benefit is misstated, any amount payable or benefit accruing under the policy shall be in an amount as the premium would purchase at the correct age.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-344; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 344; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-107

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-107.
Dividends.

In participating policies, beginning not later than the end of the third policy year, the insurer shall annually ascertain and apportion the divisible surplus, if any, that will accrue on the policy anniversary or other dividend date specified in the policy, provided the policy is in force and all premiums to that date are paid. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any dividend payable, at the option of the party entitled to elect the option, shall be either payable in cash or applied to any of the other dividend options provided by the policy. If any other dividend options are provided, the policy shall further state which option is automatically effective if the party does not elect some other option. If the policy specifies a period within which the other dividend option may be elected, the period shall be not less than thirty (30) days following the date on which the dividend is due and payable. The annually apportioned dividend is payable in cash within the meaning of the cash option specified in this subsection even though the policy provides that payment of the dividend is to be deferred for a specified period, provided the period does not exceed six (6) years from the date of apportionment and that interest will be added to the dividend at a specified rate.

Renewable term policies of ten (10) years or less may provide that:

The surplus accrued to the policies shall be determined and apportioned each year after the second policy year and accumulated during each renewal period;

At the end of the renewal period, on the insured’s renewal of the policy, the insurer shall apply the accumulated surplus as an annuity for the next succeeding renewal term in reducing premiums.

In participating industrial life insurance policies, instead of the provision required in subsection (a) of this section, there shall be a provision that beginning not later than the end of the fifth policy year, the policy shall participate annually in the divisible surplus, if any, in the manner set forth in the policy.

This section does not apply to insurance issued in consideration of lapsed or surrendered policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 345; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-345; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-108

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-108.
Policy loans.

As used in this section:

“Policy” includes certificates issued by a fraternal benefit society and annuity contracts which provide for policy loans;

“Policyholder” includes the owner of the policy or the person designated to pay premiums as shown on the records of the life insurer;

“Policy loan” includes any premium loan made under a policy to pay one (1) or more premiums not paid to the life insurer when due;

“Published monthly average” means:

Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average-Monthly Average Corporates as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. or any successor; or

If the Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average-Monthly Average Corporates is no longer published, a substantially similar average established by regulation of the commissioner.

“The rate of interest on policy loans” authorized under this section includes the interest rate charged on reinstatement of policy loans for the period during and after any lapse of a policy.

After three (3) full years premiums are paid and after the policy has a cash surrender value and while no premium is in default beyond the grace period, the insurer will advance, on proper assignment or pledge of the policy and on the sole security of the policy, at a specified rate of interest, an amount equal to or at the option of the entitled party less than the policy’s loan value. The policy loan value shall be at least equal to the cash surrender value at the end of the then current policy year, provided that the insurer may deduct from the loan value or from the loan proceeds, any existing indebtedness not already deducted in determining the cash surrender value including any interest then accrued but not due, any unpaid balance of the premium for the current policy year and interest on the loan to the end of the current policy year.

The policy may also provide that:

If interest on any indebtedness is not paid when due, it shall be added to the existing indebtedness and shall bear interest at the same rate; and

If the total indebtedness on the policy, including interest due or accrued, equals or exceeds the amount of the policy loan value, the policy terminates and is void after notice is mailed by the insurer within at least thirty (30) days to the last address of record with the insurer of the insured or other policy owner and of any assignee of record at the insurer’s home office.

The policy shall reserve the insurer’s right to defer the granting of a loan, other than for the payment of any premium to the insurer, for six (6) months after application. The provision shall also contain a table indicating in writing the loan values each year during the first twenty (20) years of the policy or during the term of the policy, whichever is shorter.

The policy, at the insurer’s option, may provide for automatic premium loan.

This section does not apply to:

Term policies;

Term insurance benefits provided by rider or supplemental policy provisions; or

Industrial life insurance policies.

Policies issued on or after July 1, 1983 shall provide for policy loan interest rates as follows:

A provision permitting a maximum interest rate of not more than eight percent (8%) per year; or

A provision permitting an adjustable maximum interest rate established from time to time by the life insurer as authorized by law.

The rate of interest charged on a policy loan made under paragraph (g)(ii) of this section shall not exceed the higher of the published monthly average for the calendar month ending two (2) months prior to the date on which the rate is determined or the rate used to compute the cash surrender values under the policy during the applicable period plus one percent (1%) per year.

The policy shall contain a provision stating the frequency at which the rate is to be determined for that policy. The maximum rate for each policy shall be determined at regular intervals at least once every twelve (12) months but not more than once every three (3) months. At the intervals specified in the policy:

The rate charged may be increased if the increase determined under subsection (h) of this section increases the rate by one-half percent (1/2%) or more per year; and

The rate charged shall be reduced if the reduction determined under subsection (h) of this section decreases the rate by one-half percent (1/2%) or more per year.

The life insurer shall:

Notify the policyholder of the initial rate of interest on the loan at the time a cash loan is made;

Notify the policyholder of the initial rate of interest on a premium loan as soon as reasonably practical after making the initial loan. No notice is required if an additional premium loan is added except as provided in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Provide policyholders having loans reasonable advance notice of any rate increase; and

Include in notices to policyholders required by this subsection the substance of the pertinent provisions of subsections (g) and (j) of this section.

The loan value of the policy shall be determined in accordance with W.S. 26-16-202(a)(vi). No policy shall terminate in a policy year as the sole result of a change in the interest rate during that policy year. The life insurer shall maintain coverage during that policy year until the time at which it would otherwise have terminated if there had been no interest rate change during that policy year.

The substance of the pertinent provisions of subsections (g) and (j) of this section shall be stated within the policies to which they apply.

No other provision of law shall apply to policy loan interest rates unless made specifically applicable to such rates.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-346; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 346; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-109

; Laws 1983, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Specific performance of agreement to lend or borrow money, 82 ALR3d 1116.

§ 26-16-109.
Table of installments required.

In case the policy provides that the proceeds are payable in installments which are determinable at issue of the policy, there shall be a table showing the amounts of the guaranteed installments.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-347; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 347; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-110

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-110.
Reinstatement of policies.

Unless the policy has been surrendered for its cash surrender value, or its cash surrender value has been exhausted, or the paid-up term insurance, if any, has expired, the policy will be reinstated at any time within three (3) years, or two (2) years in the case of industrial life insurance policies, from the date of premium default upon:

Written application therefor;

The production of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer;

The payment of all premiums in arrears;

The payment or reinstatement of any other indebtedness to the insurer upon the policy; and

The payment of interest at a rate not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum compounded annually on all payments required for reinstatement.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26-125, 26.1-348; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 348; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-111

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Applied

in

Bruegger v. National Old Line Ins. Co., 387 F. Supp. 1177, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14077 (D. Wyo. 1975).

§ 26-16-111.
Time and place of payment of premiums.

The time and place of payment of premiums shall be specified.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-349; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 349; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-112

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Grace period for payment of premiums under former statute.—

See Addison v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 358 P.2d 948,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 74

(Wyo. 1961).

§ 26-16-112.
Payment of claims.

If the benefits under the policy are payable because of the death of the insured, settlement shall be made upon receipt of proof of death and, at the insurer’s option, surrender of the policy or proof of the interest of the claimant, or both. If an insurer shall specify a particular period prior to the expiration of which settlement shall be made, the period may not exceed the time requirements specified in W.S.

26-15-124

. For any private placement policy, settlement may be made in cash or, if allowed under the policy, by distributing assets of the separate account to the claimant with the consent of the policyholder, as long as the fair market value of the assets are independently verified at the time of disbursement by the insurer. In any private placement policy, the obligation of the insurer to settle that portion of the policy attributable to separate account assets is subject to the liquidity of the assets and the insurer shall settle the portion of the policy as and when the assets can be, by their respective terms, either converted to cash, which may be later than the time requirements specified in W.S.

26-15-124

, or otherwise dispersible by the insurer.

Benefits shall be paid within the time requirements of W.S.

26-15-124

and shall include interest accrued from the date of death until date of payment. The interest rate shall be not less than the rate of interest payable on death proceeds left on deposit with the insurer. For any private placement policy, the interest shall be computed commencing the latter of sixty (60) days succeeding the date of death of the insured or the date proof of death has been received by the insurer in good order, until the date of payment. In any private placement policy, the obligation of the insurer to pay interest on that portion of the policy attributable to separate account assets may only be computed as and when the assets are, by their respective terms, either converted to cash or otherwise dispersible by the insurer.

For purposes of this section, date of payment shall include the date of the postmark stamped on an envelope properly addressed and postage prepaid, containing the payment.

The provisions of this section requiring the payment of interest shall not apply to variable contracts which provide for insurance or annuity benefits which may vary according to the investment experience of any separate account or accounts maintained by the insurer as to such contract.

As used in this chapter, “private placement policy” is a variable life insurance policy that is:

Issued exclusively to a person who is an accredited investor or a qualified purchaser, as defined in the Securities Act of 1933 or the Investment Company Act of 1940 or in regulations promulgated under either statute; and

Offered for sale and sold in a transaction that is exempt from registration under the Securities Act of 1933.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 32; 1931, ch. 15, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-232; C.S. 1945, § 52-510; Laws 1947, ch. 11, § 3; 1951, ch. 107, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-125, 26.1-350; Laws 1959, ch. 68, § 2; 1967, ch. 136, § 350; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-113

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1999, ch. 45, § 1; 2020 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, redesignated the first sentence of the undesignated paragraph as (a) and added the last three sentences; redesignated the second and third sentences of the undesignated paragraph as (b) and added the last two sentences; redesignated the fourth sentence of the undesignated paragraph as (c); redesignated the fifth sentence of the undesignated paragraph as (d); and added (e).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Policy provision limiting time within which action may be brought on the policy as applicable to tort action by insured against insurer, 66 ALR4th 859.

§ 26-16-113.
Beneficiaries of industrial life insurance policies.

An industrial life insurance policy shall have the name of the beneficiary designated thereon, or in the application or other form if attached to the policy, with a reservation of the right to designate or change the beneficiary after the issuance of the policy, unless the beneficiary is irrevocably designated.

The policy may also provide that:

No designation or change of beneficiary is binding on the insurer until endorsed on the policy by the insurer;

The insurer may refuse to endorse the name of any proposed beneficiary who does not appear to the insurer to have an insurable interest in the insured’s life;

If the beneficiary designated in the policy does not make a claim under the policy or does not surrender the policy with proof of death within the period stated in the policy, which shall not be less than thirty (30) days after the insured’s death, or if the beneficiary is the estate of the insured, or is a minor, or dies before the insured, or is not legally competent to give a valid release, the insurer may make any payment thereunder to the insured’s executor or administrator, or to any relative of the insured by blood or legal adoption or connection by marriage, or to any person appearing to the insurer to be equitably entitled thereto because of having been named beneficiary or having incurred expense for the insured’s maintenance, medical attention or burial.

The policy may also include a provision similar to that in paragraph (b)(iii) of this section applicable to any other payment due under the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 351; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-351; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-114

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is medical expense “incurred” under policy providing for payment of medical expenses incurred within fixed period of time from date of injury, 65 ALR5th 649.

§ 26-16-114.
Title on policy.

There shall be a title on the policy briefly describing the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 352; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-352; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-115

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-115.
Excluded or restricted coverage under incontestability clause.

A clause in any life insurance policy providing that the policy is incontestable after a specified period precludes only a contest of the policy’s validity and does not preclude the assertion at any time of defenses based upon provisions in the policy which exclude or restrict coverage, whether or not the restrictions or exclusions are excepted in the clause.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 353; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-353; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-116

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-116.
Annuity and pure endowment contracts; standard provisions.

No annuity or pure endowment contract, other than reversionary, survivorship or group annuities and except as stated in this section, shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains provisions conforming in substance to each of the provisions specified in W.S.

26-16-117

. Any of the provisions not applicable to single premium annuities or single premium pure endowment contracts, to that extent, shall not be incorporated in the policy.

This section does not apply to contracts for deferred annuities included in or upon the lives of beneficiaries under life insurance policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 354; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-354; W.S. 1977, §

26-16-117

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-117.
Annuity and pure endowment contracts; provisions to be contained.

Any annuity or pure endowment contract, other than a reversionary, survivorship or group annuity, shall contain provisions as specified in this section.

There shall be a grace period of one (1) month, but not less than thirty (30) days, within which any stipulated payment to the insurer falling due after the first may be made, subject at the option of the insurer to an interest charge thereon at a rate to be specified in the contract but not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum for the number of days of grace elapsing before the payment. The contract shall continue in full force during the grace period. If a claim arises under the contract because of death prior to expiration of the grace period before the overdue payment to the insurer or the deferred payments of the current contract year, if any, are made, the amount of the payments, with interest on any overdue payments, may be deducted from any amount payable under the contract in settlement.

If any statements, other than those relating to age, sex and identity, are required as a condition to issuing an annuity or pure endowment contract, and subject to subsection (e) of this section the contract is incontestable after it is in force during the lifetime of the person or of each of the persons as to whom the statements are required, for a period of two (2) years from its date of issue, except for nonpayment of stipulated payments to the insurer. At the insurer’s option the contract may also except any provisions relative to benefits in case of disability and any provisions which grant insurance specifically against death by accident or accidental means.

The contract constitutes the entire contract between the parties, or if a copy of the application is endorsed upon or attached to the contract when issued, the contract and the application therefor constitute the entire contract between the parties.

If the age or sex of any person upon whose life the contract is made is misstated, the amount payable or benefits accruing under the contract shall be in an amount as the stipulated payment to the insurer would purchase according to the correct age or sex. If the insurer overpays because of any such misstatement, the amount of overpayment with interest at the rate to be specified in the contract, but not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, may be charged against the current or next succeeding payment the insurer makes under the contract.

In a participating contract the insurer shall annually ascertain and apportion any divisible surplus accruing on the contract.

The contract may be reinstated at any time within one (1) year from the default in making stipulated payments to the insurer, unless the cash surrender value has been paid. Any overdue stipulated payments and any indebtedness to the insurer on the contract shall be paid or reinstated with interest thereon at a rate to be specified in the contract but not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum payable annually. In applicable cases the insurer may also require evidence of insurability to its satisfaction.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 355 to 360; W.S. 1957, §§ 26.1-355 to 36.1-360; W.S. 1977, §§

26-16-118

to 26-16-123; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-118.
Standard provisions for reversionary annuities.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no contract for a reversionary annuity shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless it contains in substance:

The provisions specified in W.S.

26-16-117

, except that under W.S.

26-16-117

the insurer, at its option, may provide for an equitable reduction of the amount of the annuity payments in settlement of an overdue payment instead of providing for deduction of the payments from an amount payable upon settlement under the contract; and

A provision that the contract may be reinstated at any time within three (3) years from the date of default in making stipulated payments to the insurer, upon production of evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer, and upon condition that all overdue payments and any indebtedness to the insurer because of the contract be paid, or, within the limits permitted by the then cash values of the contract, reinstated with interest as to both payments and indebtedness at a rate to be specified in the contract but not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum compounded annually.

This section does not apply to group annuities or to annuities included in life insurance policies, and any of those provisions not applicable to single premium annuities, to that extent, shall not be incorporated in the policies.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 361; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-361; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-124; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-16-119.
Provisions limiting liability in life insurance policies prohibited; exceptions.

No life insurance policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state if it contains any provision:

Limiting the time within which an action at law or in equity may be commenced on the policy to less than three (3) years after the cause of action has accrued;

Which excludes or restricts liability for death caused in a certain specified manner or occurring while the insured has a specified status, except that a policy may contain provisions excluding or restricting coverage as specified therein in case of death under any of the following circumstances:

Death as a result, directly or indirectly, of war, declared or undeclared, or of any act or hazard of a war or action;

Death as a result of aviation or any air travel or flight;

Death as a result of a specified hazardous occupation. Service in the military, naval or air forces or in civilian forces auxiliary thereto shall not be a specified hazardous occupation under this subparagraph;

Death while the insured is a resident outside [the] continental United States and Canada; or

Death within two (2) years from the date of issue of the policy as a result of suicide, while sane or insane.

A policy which contains any exclusion or restriction pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall also provide that in case of death under the circumstances to which the exclusion or restriction applies, the insurer shall pay an amount not less than a reserve determined according to the commissioners’ reserve valuation method upon the basis of the mortality table and interest rate specified in the policy for the calculation of nonforfeiture benefits, or if the policy does not provide for such benefits, computed according to a mortality table and interest rate determined by the insurer and specified in the policy, with adjustment for indebtedness or dividend credit.

This section does not apply to group life insurance, disability insurance, reinsurance or annuities, or to any provision in a life insurance policy or contract supplemental thereto relating to disability benefits or to additional benefits in case of death by accident or accidental means.

Nothing in this section prohibits any provision which in the commissioner’s opinion is more favorable to the policyholder than a provision permitted by this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 362; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-362; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-125; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2005, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

rewrote (a)(ii)(A) and added the last sentence in (a)(ii)(C).

Laws 2005, ch. 52, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 52, § 2, provides that the act applies to insurance policies issued, renewed, delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after the effective date of this act.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Understanding the New Tort of First Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: McCullough v. Golden Rule Insurance Company,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Death during or after surgery as accidental within coverage of health or accident insurance policy, 91 ALR3d 1042.

Liability insurance: intoxication or other mental incapacity avoiding application of clause in liability policy specifically exempting coverage of injury or damage caused intentionally by or at direction of insured, 33 ALR4th 983.

Acts in self-defense as within provision of liability insurance policy expressly excluding coverage for damage or injury intended or expected by insured, 34 ALR4th 761.

§ 26-16-120.
Prohibited provisions generally in life insurance policies and industrial life insurance policies.

No life insurance policy, other than industrial insurance, shall be issued or delivered in this state, or be issued by any domestic insurer, if it contains any provision:

By which the policy purports to be issued or to take effect more than one (1) year before the original application for the insurance is made, if thereby the insured would rate at an age more than one (1) year younger than his insuring age at date when application is made;

For any mode of settlement at maturity of the policy of less value than the amount insured under the policy, plus dividend additions, if any, less any indebtedness to the insurer on or secured by the policy and less any premium that, by the terms of the policy, may be deducted. This paragraph does not apply to any nonforfeiture provisions which employ the cash value less indebtedness, if any, to purchase automatic paid-up or extended insurance, nor does it apply to graded death benefits in juvenile policies at ages one (1) to sixteen (16) years.

No industrial life insurance policy shall contain any provision:

By which the insurer may deny liability under the policy for the reason that the insured previously obtained other insurance from the same insurer;

Giving the insurer the right to declare the policy void because the insured:

Has had any disease or ailment, whether specified or not, or because the insured has received institutional, hospital, medical or surgical treatment or attention, except a provision which gives the insurer the right to declare the policy void if the insured, within two (2) years prior to the issuance of the policy, received institutional, hospital, medical or surgical treatment or attention and if the insured or claimant under the policy fails to show that the condition occasioning that treatment or attention was not of a serious nature or was not material to the risk;

Has been rejected for insurance, unless the right is conditioned upon the insurer showing that knowledge of the rejection would have led to the insurer’s refusal to make the contract.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 33; 1931, ch. 65, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 57-233; Laws 1939, ch. 75, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 52-511; Laws 1953, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-127, 26.1-363; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 363; W.S. 1977, § 26-16-126; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure to disclose terminal illness as basis for life insurer's avoidance of high-risk, high-premium policy requiring no health warranties or proof of insurability, 42 ALR4th 158.

§ 26-16-121.
Failure to pay premiums; notification.

When an employer or trustee of a fund established or adopted by an employer, which employer or trustee is deemed the policyholder of the life insurance policy insuring the employer’s employees for the benefit of persons other than the employer and where the employer or trustee routinely pays any part of the premium for the policy, if the employer or trustee fails to pay the routinely paid portion of the premium when required under the policy for any reason, the employer or trustee shall notify the employee or beneficiary, electronically or in writing, within thirty (30) days of the failure to pay.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 29, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 29, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.